Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.223

Director—Administration and interpretation.

The director shall have the power and broad administrative discretion to administer and interpret the provisions of this chapter to fulfill the intent of the legislature as expressed in RCW 19.146.005.

[ 1994 c 33 s 2.]